Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.19
Franchise, defined.

Franchise means
a contract between two or more persons when all of the following conditions
are included:

(1) A commercial
relationship of definite duration or continuing indefinite duration is involved;

(2) The franchisee
is granted the right to offer and sell motor vehicles manufactured or distributed
by the franchisor;

(3)
The franchisee, as an independent business, constitutes a component of the
franchisor's distribution system;

(4) The operation of the franchisee's business is
substantially associated with the franchisor's trademark, service mark, trade
name, advertising, or other commercial symbol designating the franchisor;
and

(5)
The operation of the franchisee's business is substantially reliant on the
franchisor for the continued supply of motor vehicles, parts, and accessories.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 31.